Utah statutes.
78B-6-1602 (Superseded 07/01/11).   Definitions.

As used in this part:

(1)  "Alcoholic beverage" is as defined in Section 32A-1-105.

(2)  "Emergency response provider" means an individual providing services on behalf of:

(a)  a law enforcement agency;

(b)  a fire suppression agency; or

(c)  another agency or a political subdivision of the state.

(3)  "Law enforcement officer" is as defined in Section 53-13-103.

(4)  "Local entity" means the political subdivision for which an emergency response provider provides emergency services.

(5)  "Minor" means an individual under the age of 18 years old.

(6) (a)  Subject to Subsection (6)(b), "response costs" means the actual costs directly associated with an emergency response provider responding to, remaining at, or otherwise dealing with an underage drinking gathering, including:

(i)  the costs of medical treatment to or for an emergency response provider injured because of an activity described in this Subsection (6)(a); and

(ii)  the cost of repairing damage to equipment or property of a local entity that is attributable to an activity described in this Subsection (6)(a).

(b)  "Response costs" does not include:

(i)  the salary and benefits of an emergency response provider for the amount of time spent responding to, remaining at, or otherwise dealing with an underage drinking gathering; or

(ii)  the administrative costs attributable to an activity described in Subsection (6)(b)(i).

(7)  "Underage drinking gathering" means a gathering of two or more individuals:

(a)  at which an individual knowingly serves, aids in the service of, or allows the service of an alcoholic beverage to an underage person; and

(b)  to which an emergency response provider is required to respond, except for a response related solely to providing medical care at the location of the gathering.

(8)  "Underage person" means an individual under the age of 21 years old.

